District of Columbia statutes.
1-627.05

Agreements authorized.

(a)

Any assignment entered into by a District agency under the authority of this subchapter must be implemented by a written agreement and this agreement shall contain the following provisions:

(1)

The signature of the employee to be assigned indicating he or she fully concurs in the assignment and has been made aware of all appropriate rules and regulations governing the assignment;

(2)

The approval of appropriate officials of the sending and receiving agencies or organizations;

(3)

The terms and conditions for the payment of salary and other expenses, and any reimbursement among participating agencies or organizations; and

(4)

The duties and responsibilities to be carried out on the assignment.

(b)

The agreement must be signed by all participants before the assignment can become effective.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2705, 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 1101(e), 43 DCR 5
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 55(a), 44 DCR 1271

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-627.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-628.5.
1973 Ed., § 1-357.5.